Utah statutes.
31A-19a-405.   Filing of rates and other rating information.

(1) (a) All workers' compensation rates, supplementary rate information, and supporting information shall be filed at least 30 days before the effective date of the rate or information.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a), on application by the filer, the commissioner may authorize an earlier effective date.

(2)  The loss and loss adjustment expense factors included in the rates filed under Subsection (1) shall be the prospective loss costs filed by the designated rate service organization under Section 31A-19a-406.

